src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! !!!Skolt Saami adjective declension


LEXICON A_
+A+WORK: # ;

LEXICON A-ATTR_
+A+Attr: # ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:»vuõtt N_MUÕRR ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_âs
+A+Attr:%>âs # ;
+A+Comp:»ab NMN_SLOOHMAN ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_ČÅRRÕS ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%>âs»vuõtt N_MUÕRR ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_as
+A+Attr:%>as # ;
+A+Comp:»ab NMN_SLOOHMAN ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_ČÅRRÕS ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%>as»vuõtt N_MUÕRR ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_es
+A+Attr:%>es # ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
!+A+Comp:»ab NMN_SLOOHMAN ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_ČÅRRÕS ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%>es»vuõtt N_MUÕRR ; 


!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_PAPP !!= * @CODE@ papp:papp
!! 
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV FINAL1 ; 
+A+Der/MWN:  N_PAPP ;

LEXICON A_TOLL
:%^V2VV%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV%^CC2C FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A+Der/MWN: N_TOLL ;

LEXICON A_KUSS !!= * @CODE@ kuss:kuss
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUSS ;

LEXICON A_PODD !!= * @CODE@ podd:podd
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN:  N_PODD ;

LEXICON A_PAARR !!= * @CODE@ paarr:paarr
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PAARR ;

LEXICON A_ŠLAAJJ !!= * @CODE@ šlaajj:šlaajj
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ŠLAAJJ ;

LEXICON A_SAAKK !!= * @CODE@ saakk:saakk
:%^KK2GG A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SAAKK ;

LEXICON A_PÕRTT !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põrtt
!! friskk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PÕRTT ;

LEXICON A_AUTT !!= * @CODE@ autt:autt
!! võikk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_AUTT ;

LEXICON A_UHSS !!= * @CODE@ uhss:uhss
:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_UHSS ;

LEXICON A_VAHTT !!= * @CODE@ vahtt:vahtt
!! viõhss
:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VAHTT ;

LEXICON A_MUÕRR !!= * @CODE@ muõrr:muõrr
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_MUÕRR ;

LEXICON A_ǨIÕJJ !!= * @CODE@ ǩiõjj:ǩiõjj
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨIÕJJ ;

LEXICON A_LUÕSS !!= * @CODE@ luõss:luõss
:%^KK2GG A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_LUÕSS ;

LEXICON A_PUÅVV !!= * @CODE@ puåvv:puåvv
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PUÅVV ;

LEXICON A_SIÂKˈK !!= * @CODE@ siâkˈk:siâkˈk
:%^CCC2CC A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SIÂKˈK ;

LEXICON A_ČUÕŠKK !!= * @CODE@ čuõškk:čuõškk
!! tuõlbb
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ČUÕŠKK ;

LEXICON A_SǨIÂŊKK !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkk:sǩiâŋkk
!! hiâlpp
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SǨIÂŊKK ;

LEXICON A_PLAAN !!= * @CODE@ plaan:plaan
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_âs ; !!Check this 2015-09-17
+A+Der/MWN:  N_PLAAN ;


!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_PẸSS !!= * @CODE@ pess:pess
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PẸSS ;

LEXICON A_ŠOOMM !!= * @CODE@ šoomm:šoomm
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ŠOOMM ;

LEXICON A_RÄÄKK !!= * @CODE@ rääkk:rääkk
:%^KK2GG A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_RÄÄKK ;

LEXICON A_ÄLDD !!= * @CODE@ äldd:äldd
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÄLDD ;

LEXICON A_KÅHTT !!= * @CODE@ kåhtt:kåhtt
:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KÅHTT ;

LEXICON A_MEÂRKK !!= * @CODE@ meârkk:meârkk
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_MEÂRKK ;

LEXICON A_VUÂRR !!= * @CODE@ vuârr:vuârr
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_VUÂRR ;

LEXICON A_TUÂJJ !!= * @CODE@ tuâjj:tuâjj
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_TUÂJJ ;

LEXICON A_ČUÄCC !!= * @CODE@ čuäcc:čuäcc
:%^KK2GG A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ČUÄCC ;

LEXICON A_NEÄVˈV !!= * @CODE@ neävv:neävˈv
:%^CCC2CC A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_NEÄVˈV ;

LEXICON A_PEÄLDD !!= * @CODE@ peäldd:peäldd
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PEÄLDD ;

LEXICON A_MEER
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! ** Yaml: __N-meer__
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
: A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_MEER ;

LEXICON A_VÄÄŽŽ
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! ** Yaml: __A-vaeaezhzh__
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
: A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VÄÄŽŽ ;

LEXICON A_ÅSKK !!= * @CODE@ åskk:åskk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÅSKK ;

LEXICON A_PLEÂN !!= * @CODE@ pleân:pleân
: A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PLEÂN ;

LEXICON A_ǨEÂLKK !!= * @CODE@ ǩeâlkk:ǩeâlkk
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨEÂLKK ;

LEXICON A_ÄKK !!= * @CODE@ äkk:äkk
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÄKK ;

!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION, ILLATIVE IN U NOMINALS

LEXICON A_LÄʹBǮǮ !!= * @CODE@ läʹbǯǯ:läʹbǯǯ
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_as ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_LÄʹBǮǮ ;

!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_NUʹBB  !!= * @CODE@ nuʹbb:nubb
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! ** Yaml: __A-nubb__
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_NUʹBB ;

LEXICON A_NJUUʹNN !!= * @CODE@ njuuʹnn:njuuʹnn
:%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_NJUUʹNN ;

LEXICON A_STUUʹL !!= * @CODE@ stuuʹl:stu%{VU%}l
   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_STUUʹL ;

LEXICON A_KUʹRČČ !!= * @CODE@ kuʹrčč:kuʹrčč
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUʹRČČ ;

LEXICON A_KUʹVǮǮ !!= * @CODE@ kuʹvǯǯ:kuʹvǯǯ
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUʹVǮǮ ;

LEXICON A_JUʹVJJ !!= * @CODE@ juʹvjj:juvjj
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JUʹVJJ ;

LEXICON A_VUEʹSS !!= * @CODE@ vueʹss:vuâss
:%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PALE%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUEʹSS ;

LEXICON A_JUEʹLǦǦ !!= * @CODE@ jueʹlǧǧ:juâlgg
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JUEʹLǦǦ ;

LEXICON A_KUEʹLL !!= * @CODE@ kueʹll:kuâll
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUEʹLL ;

LEXICON A_SUEIʹNN !!= * @CODE@ sueiʹnn:sueiʹnn
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SUEIʹNN ;

LEXICON A_MUEʹRJJ !!= * @CODE@ mueʹrjj:mueʹrjj
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_MUEʹRJJ ;

LEXICON A_ǨIEʹMNN !!= * @CODE@ ǩieʹmnn:ǩeâmnn
! vowel: diphthong
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨIEʹMNN ;

!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

LEXICON A_VÄʹLL !!= * @CODE@ väʹll:väll
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VÄʹLL ;

LEXICON A_EʹČČ !!= * @CODE@ eʹčč:ečč
! vowel: monophthong
! V1ʹC1C1
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_EʹČČ ;

LEXICON A_ÄʹVV !!= * @CODE@ äʹvv:ävv
! vowel: monophthong
! V1ʹC1C1
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÄʹVV ;

LEXICON A_ÄʹǨǨ !!= * @CODE@ äʹǩǩ:äkk
! vowel: monophthong
! V1ʹC1C1
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÄʹǨǨ ;

LEXICON A_SÄÄʹMM !!= * @CODE@ sääʹmm:säämm
:%^CC2C%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SÄÄʹMM ;

LEXICON A_ČÄÄʹCC !!= * @CODE@ čääʹcc:čääcc
:%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ČÄÄʹCC ;

LEXICON A_PÂÂʹJJ !!= * @CODE@ pââʹjj:pââjj
! vowel: monophthong
:%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PÂÂʹJJ ;

LEXICON A_KÄʹLBB !!= * @CODE@ käʹlbb:kälbb âʹlǧǧ:âlgg
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KÄʹLBB ;

LEXICON A_PÄIʹǨǨ !!= * @CODE@ päiʹǩǩ:päikk
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PÄIʹǨǨ ;

LEXICON A_SÄIʹMM !!= * @CODE@ säiʹmm:säimm
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SÄIʹMM ;

LEXICON A_ǨEʹDD !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹdd:ǩẹdd
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨEʹDD ;

LEXICON A_SEʹTT !!= * @CODE@ seʹtt:sẹtt
! vowel: monophthong
!! CHECKME
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SEʹTT ;

LEXICON A_ǨEʹMNN !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹmnn:ǩẹmnn
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨEʹMNN ;

LEXICON A_LÄÄIʹJ !!= * @CODE@ lääiʹj:lääiǥ
! vowel: monophthong
+A:%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_LÄÄIʹJ ;

LEXICON A_ǨEʹRJJ !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹrjj:ǩẹrjj
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨEʹRJJ ;

LEXICON A_TÄʹHTT !!= * @CODE@ täʹhtt:tähtt
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2VY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_TÄʹHTT ;

LEXICON A_JÄUʹRR !!= * @CODE@ jäuʹrr:jäurr
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JÄUʹRR ;

LEXICON A_PEIʹVV !!= * @CODE@ peiʹvv:pẹivv
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PEIʹVV ;
LEXICON A_PIẸʹSS !!= * @CODE@ pieʹss:peäss
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PIẸʹSS ;


LEXICON A_SUẸʹǨǨ !!= * @CODE@ sueʹǩǩ:suäkk
!! cuẹʹǩǩ
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PALẸ%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SUẸʹǨǨ ;

LEXICON A_KUẸʹTT !!= * @CODE@ kuẹʹtt:kuätt
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUẸʹTT ;

LEXICON A_VUẸIʹVV !!= * @CODE@ vuẹiʹvv:vuäivv
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUẸIʹVV ;

LEXICON A_ČUÄʹRVV !!= * @CODE@ čuäʹrvv:čuärvv
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ČUÄʹRVV ;

LEXICON A_NEUʹLL !!= * @CODE@
! vowel: monophthong
   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_NEUʹLL ;

LEXICON A_JEÄʹNˈN !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹnn:jeänˈn, jeäʹǧǧ:jeägˈg
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JEÄʹNˈN ;

LEXICON A_JEÄʹRMM !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹrmm:jeärmm
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JEÄʹRMM ;

LEXICON A_KUʹMPP !!= * @CODE@
   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUʹMPP ;

LEXICON A_KAAʹFF !!= * @CODE@
   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KAAʹFF ;

LEXICON A_KLAAʹDD !!= * @CODE@ klaaʹdd:klaaʹdd
   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KLAAʹDD ;



!! CLASS denominals in -i
!! cf. Feist (2012: 198-199)
!! These will need their own expansions
!! HOW DOES JIÕʹNNI decline?
LEXICON A_JIÕʹNNI !!= * @CODE@ jiõʹnni:jiõnn
+A+Attr:%^PAL%>es #   ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PAL%>i  # ;
+A:%^PAL%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:%^PAL%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PÄRRAI !!= * @CODE@ pärrai:pärr
+A+Attr:%>as #   ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%>ai  # ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_SÄLTTAI !!= * @CODE@ sälttai:sältt
+A+Attr:%>as #   ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%>ai  # ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


!! CLASS 

LEXICON A_TÄÄVTÕS
!! -õs ending
+A: AdjAttr-Ø ;
+A: SG-NOM ;
+A:s%>â ESS ;
+A:s%>â PAR ;
+A: NMN_OBL-TÄÄVTÕS ;

LEXICON A_ČÂUSTÕK
!! -õs ending
+A: AdjAttr-Ø ;
+A: SG-NOM ;
+A:s%>â ESS ;
+A:s%>â PAR ;
+A: NMN_OBL-TÄÄVTÕS ;

LEXICON A_KÅÅLVAK
+A: NMN_KÅÅLVAK ;
LEXICON A_PÅÅTTAǨ
+A: NMN_PÅÅTTAǨ ;

LEXICON A_KUÂLAŽ
+A+Sg+Nom:až FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:až FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A+Der/MWN: N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON A_VÕÕNÂS !!= * @CODE@ võõnâs:võnnâz
+A+Sg+Nom:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_OOĐÂS !!= * @CODE@ oođâs:ođđ
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz NMN_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_KÕÕDDÂS !!= * @CODE@ kõõddâs:kõdd
+A+Sg+Nom:%^Pen%^V2VV%>âs FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>âz FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_JÕÕSKÂS !!= * @CODE@ jõõskâs:jõskk
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz NMN_TAALKÂS ;

LEXICON A_PIIUTÂS !!= * @CODE@ piiutâs:pihtt
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz NMN_TAALKÂS ;

LEXICON A_FIINÂS !!= * @CODE@ fiinâs:fijnn
+A+Attr:%^XYY2VY FINAL1 ;	! fiin
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz NMN_FIINÂS ;	! fijnnâz


LEXICON A_IIRÂS !!= * @CODE@ iirâs:irr
+A+Attr:%^PAL%>es FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_ÕÕMÂS !!= * @CODE@ õõmâs:õmm
+A+Attr:sõs FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_RUÕDDÂS !!= * @CODE@ ruõddâs:ruõdˈd
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz N_RUÕDDÂS ;

LEXICON A_TUÕVÂS !!= * @CODE@ tuõvâs:tuõvv
+A+Attr:sõs FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz N_TUÕVÂS ;


LEXICON A_VUÕIVÂS !!= * @CODE@ vuõivâs:vuõivv
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VUÕIVÂS ;
